Hawaii, session 2025, GM1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Chapter 205A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§205A- Special management area use permits; affordable
multi-family rental housing; redevelopment. (a) Subject to
terms and conditions under section 205A-26, the director of a
county planning department may issue a special management area
use permit to an applicant to redevelop permanent affordable
multi-family rental housing that has been substantially
destroyed as a result of a disaster from a wildfire, hurricane,
or earthquake proclaimed by the governor to constitute a state
of emergency under chapter 127A.
(b) After issuing a special management area use permit
pursuant to this section, the county planning department in the
respective county shall file a notice of the issuance in the
2025-2754 SB1170 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
next available issue of the periodic bulletin of the office of
planning and sustainable development.
(c) This section shall not apply to parcels on the
shoreline or parcels impacted by waves, storm surges, high tide,
or shoreline erosion."
PART II
SECTION 2. Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
read as follows;
"§46- Affordable multi-family rental housing;
experimental and demonstration housing projects; redevelopment,
(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if an
affordable multi-family rental housing project that was
originally developed as an experimental and demonstration
housing project pursuant to section 46-15 has been substantially
destroyed as a result of a disaster from a wildfire, hurricane,
or earthquake proclaimed by the governor to constitute a state
of emergency under chapter 127A;
(1) Any ordinance-approved by a county for the initial
construction of the experimental and demonstration
housing project shall remain valid and relevant and
2025-2754 SB1170 CDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
continue to be in full force and effect with respect
to the rebuilding of the project in accordance with
this section;
(2) The director of a county planning department in the
respective county or any other state or county agency
authorized to issue a permit or approval reguired for
the rebuilding of the project may amend or modify the
final plans and specifications of the experimental and
demonstration housing project to incorporate
cost-effective best industry practices that include
advances in building design, materials, construction
types, or methods; provided that any modification
shall adhere to principles that emphasize community,
history, culture, future resilience, and the safety
and well-being of the project's occupants; provided
further that the modifications shall not impose
reguirements or conditions that unreasonably increase
rebuilding or future operating costs; and
(3) Notwithstanding any termination of the applicable
emergency proclamation before the completion of
construction, the experimental and demonstration
2025-2754 SB1170 GDI SMA.docx 3
iiiiiiininiiniiiiiiniiiiii

Page 4 1170
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
housing project shall not be subject to any specific
provisions of law suspended pursuant to the emergency
proclamation issued under section 127A-13, if an
application for the initial permit or approval to
commence rebuilding of the project has been submitted
to the county planning department, the department or
office of housing of a county, or any other relevant
agency of the state or applicable county before the
end of the disaster emergency relief period; provided
that the submitted application was deemed by the
relevant state or county department or agency as
complete.
(b) This section shall not apply to parcels on the
shoreline or parcels impacted by waves, storm surges, high tide,
or shoreline erosion.”
SECTION 3. Chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
”§2O1H- Affordable multi-family rental housing;
redevelopment. After issuing a special management area use
permit pursuant section 205A- , the county planning department
2025-2754 SB1170 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5
S.B. NO.
h.D. 3
C.D. 1
in the^^S£ect2^ye count y and any ot]Ter st ate or county a2ency
aijthori z^d t^i^sue a£er7nit or a££roya l sha]J^£ri£rit2^ze
ap£roydm3^erinit s t^redeyelo£tJie 2errnaiient af^or^Bb3^
multi-family rental housing."
SECTION 4. Chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§343- Affordable multi-family rental housing;
redevelopment. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 201H or
under federal law, permanently affordable multi-family rental
housing projects that are being redeveloped pursuant to a
special management area use permit issued under section
205A- that are located on properties or districts on the
Hawaii or national register of historic places shall be exempt
from the requirements of this chapter.”
PART III
SECTION 5. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
2025-2754 SB1170 CDl SMA.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO. s™
C.D. 1
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 6. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2754 SB1170 CDl SMA.docx
■IliiiMMIIIIIIIM

1170
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
CD. 1
APPROVED this gth day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAPl

S.B. No. 1170, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1170, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives